District of Columbia statutes.
31-4429

Election or appointment of officers; required security.

There shall be a president, a secretary, and a treasurer of the company, who shall be elected by the directors; and also such subordinate officers as may be elected or appointed, and who may be required to give security for the faithful performance of the duties of their office, as this subdivision and the company by its bylaws may require.

History

June 19, 1934, 48 Stat. 1151, ch. 672, ch. III, § 29

Cross References

Hospital and medical services corporation, applicability of this section, see § 31-3503.
Quo warranto proceedings to question right to corporate office, see § 16-3501 et seq.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 31-3503.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-629.
1973 Ed., § 35-529.